Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.032

Public and private institutions offering teacher preparation programs—Exploration of methods to enhance awareness of teacher preparation programs.

The state's public and private institutions of higher education offering teacher preparation programs and school districts are encouraged to explore ways to facilitate faculty exchanges, and other cooperative arrangements, to generate increased awareness and understanding by higher education faculty of the common school teaching experience and increased awareness and understanding by common school faculty of the teacher preparation programs.

[ 1987 c 525 s 233.]

NOTES:

Intent—Short title—1987 c 525 ss 202-233: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Severability—1987 c 525: See note following RCW 28A.300.050.